Iowa, session 2025-2026, 5498XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 5498XD (5) 91
jda/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 256.16, subsection 1, Code 2026, is
amended by adding the following new paragraphs:
NEW PARAGRAPH. p. (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, include
clinical experiences and preparation to prepare students
admitted to an approved practitioner preparation program to
serve students with disabilities and English learners that
incorporates knowledge, skills, and dispositions for each
student admitted to an approved practitioner preparation
program.
(2) The rules adopted by the state board pursuant to this
paragraph must prescribe practicum and clinical experience
standards for all higher education institutions providing
practitioner preparation related to serving students with
disabilities and English learners, differentiated by standards
that are applicable to all students admitted to an approved
practitioner preparation program in addition to standards that
are applicable to students who are seeking an endorsement in
special education or English learner instruction.
(a) Clinical experiences for all students admitted to
an approved practitioner preparation program must include a
minimum of fifteen practicum hours focused on differentiation
of instruction and support for special populations, including
supporting English learners, special education experiences, and
instructional implementation and progress monitoring applicable
to individualized education programs.
(b) Clinical experiences for students admitted to an
approved practitioner preparation program who are seeking
an endorsement in English learner instruction must include
a minimum of forty practicum hours, inclusive of methods of
teaching English to English learners in both elementary and
secondary school settings.
(3) The department shall establish a process to routinely
review and provide ongoing support for the adoption and
implementation of standards for preparation of teacher and
administrator candidates in serving students with disabilities
LSB 5498XD (5) 91
-1- jda/jh 1/5

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
and English learners.
NEW PARAGRAPH. q. (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, administer
prior to a student’s completion of the practitioner preparation
program, and require that each student complete, a summative
end-of-program assessment that is designed to measure the
student’s preparation in content areas that are required for
the endorsement area in which the student will be teaching,
and that was distributed to the higher education institution
providing practitioner preparation by the department pursuant
to subparagraph (2). A higher education institution providing
practitioner preparation shall identify appropriate student
remediation opportunities in endorsement areas by analyzing
student performance on the summative end-of-program assessment
described in this subparagraph compared to the score set by the
department pursuant to subparagraph (2).
(2) (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall
identify and distribute to all higher education institutions
providing practitioner preparation a unified, valid, and
reliable summative end-of-program assessment required for each
endorsement area. The department shall set the minimum score
for each summative end-of-program assessment identified and
distributed pursuant to this subparagraph subdivision that will
be used to determine mastery of content by a student enrolled
in the practitioner preparation program.
(b) If, subsequent to July 1, 2027, the department creates
a new endorsement area, then the department shall identify
and distribute to all higher education institutions providing
practitioner preparation a unified, valid, and reliable
summative end-of-program assessment required for the new
endorsement area as soon as is reasonably possible after the
creation of the new endorsement area. The department shall set
the minimum score for each summative end-of-program assessment
identified and distributed pursuant to this subparagraph
subdivision that will be used to determine mastery of content
by a student enrolled in the practitioner preparation program.
LSB 5498XD (5) 91
-2- jda/jh 2/5

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
(3) (a) Report to the department, in the form and manner
prescribed by the department, information related to the scores
attained by students on the summative end-of-program assessment
administered pursuant to subparagraph (1).
(b) Beginning August 1, 2028, the department shall publish
on the department’s internet site all of the following:
(i) Program-level data related to the passage rates
attained by students on the summative end-of-program assessment
administered pursuant to subparagraph (1).
(ii) Efforts the department has made to support the higher
education institutions providing practitioner preparation in
the implementation of curriculum improvements, remediation
techniques, and program evaluation.
(iii) Examples of program remediation and assessment plans
that higher education institutions providing practitioner
preparation have provided to students who scored below the
minimum score set by the department pursuant to subparagraph
(2) prior to the student’s completion of the practitioner
preparation program.
Sec. 2. Section 256.16, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 3. For purposes of this section, “English
learner” means the same as defined in section 280.4.
Sec. 3. Section 256.146, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 28. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A
that require an individual who has applied to a school to
teach in a special education setting to complete a self-paced
course created by the department of education as a condition
of awarding the individual a class B license or a conditional
license. The self-paced course must include content related to
basic special education laws, assessment procedures, and other
essential competencies.